Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.053

District-based elections—Redistricting committee—Membership.

(1) A county redistricting committee established under this chapter must have five members appointed in each year ending in one, as follows:

(a) One member shall be appointed by the members of each of the two largest caucuses, respectively, of the house of representatives whose legislative districts are wholly or partially within the noncharter county with a population of four hundred thousand or more;

(b) One member shall be appointed by the members of each of the two largest caucuses, respectively, of the senate whose legislative districts are wholly or partially within the noncharter county with a population of four hundred thousand or more; and

(c) The fifth member, who shall serve as the nonvoting chair of the committee, shall be appointed by a majority of the other four members.

(2) Committee members may not be appointed until after January 1, 2021.

(a) If any member is not appointed in accordance with the process in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section by March 1st then the respective legislative leader of each caucus whose qualifying members have not made an appointment must make the respective appointment by April 1st. If any caucus does not have at least one qualifying member, then the legislative leader of that caucus shall make the appointment by April 1st.

(b) If the fifth member is not appointed in accordance with subsection (1)(c) of this section by April 15th, then the county board of commissioners must appoint the fifth member by April 30th.

(3) A vacancy on a redistricting committee must be filled in the same manner as the initial appointment within fifteen days after the vacancy occurs.

(4) No person may serve on a redistricting committee who:

(a) Is not a registered voter of the state at the time of appointment;

(b) Is not a resident of the county;

(c) Is or within two years before appointment was a consultant for or had a contract with the county, or had been a registered lobbyist that lobbies the county commission; or

(d) Is or within two years before appointment was an elected official or elected legislative, county, or state party officer.

(5) Members of a redistricting committee may not:

(a) Campaign for elective office while a member of the committee;

(b) Actively participate in or contribute to any political campaign of any candidate for county elective office while a member of the committee; or

(c) Hold or campaign for a seat as a county commissioner for two years after the date the redistricting committee concludes its duties under this chapter.

(6) Before serving on a county redistricting committee, every person must take and subscribe an oath to faithfully perform the duties of that office.

(7) The legislative body of the county will provide adequate funding and resources to support the duties of the redistricting committee.

[ 2018 c 301 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—2018 c 301: See notes following RCW 36.32.051.